Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.44.010

Population determination.

The population of code cities shall be determined for specific purposes in accordance with any express provision of state law relating thereto. Where no express provision is made, the provisions of RCW 43.41.110(7) relating to the office of financial management and the provisions of RCW 35.13.260 shall govern.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 32; 1979 c 151 s 36; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.44.010.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.